Mississippi, session 2026, SB2534.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The following terms have the following meanings as used in this act: (a)  "Board" means the Mississippi State Board of Medical Licensure. (b)  "Department" means the Mississippi State Department of Health. (c)  "Federal and state abstinence education law" means the requirements of Section 510 of the Social Security Act, 42 USC § 710, and Section 37-13-171. (d)  "Private auditor" means a private auditing firm selected and appointed by and serving at the will and pleasure of the Governor. (e)  "REAP Act" means Chapter 141, Title 41, Mississippi Code of 1972. (f)  "Women's Health Defense Act of 2013" means Sections 41-41-101 through 41-41-117, Mississippi Code of 1972. (2)  On or before June 1, 2026, the Governor shall select and appoint a private auditor to perform an audit of the board and the department.  The audit shall determine the extent to which the board and the department has complied with, and made efforts to comply with, as applicable: (a)  Federal and state abstinence education law; (b)  The REAP Act; and (c)  The Women's Health Defense Act of 2013. (3)  As part of the audit, the private auditor shall have the authority to request documents from the audited agency, to conduct interviews of agency personnel and other interested parties and to pose written questions to the agency, which shall be answered by agency personnel within sixty (60) days of receipt of the written questions. (4)  Not later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the private auditor's appointment, the private auditor shall provide to the board and the department a preliminary report detailing any apparent noncompliance with federal and state law regarding welfare eligibility and fraud prevention by the board or the department, as the case may be.  The board and the department shall provide reasons for any cited noncompliance and may provide the private auditor with objections, audit findings and any supporting documentation. (5)  On or before January 1, 2027, and on January 1 of each year thereafter, the private auditor shall provide a report to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor and Speaker of the House of Representatives detailing the findings of the audit required under this act.  These reports shall be considered public records under the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983, Sections 25-61-1 through 25-61-19. SECTION 2. This act shall be effective from and after its passage.